North Carolina, session 2025, HB219.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. G.S. 153A-250 is repealed.
SECTION 2. Article 13 of Chapter 153A of the General Statutes is amended by
adding a new section to read:
"§ 153A-251. Level of care modifications.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a county manager or EMS administrator
delegated the authority to act on behalf of the county shall not be required to sign a document or
otherwise approve of a modification in the level of care being provided by a provider within the
county's emergency management system. For purposes of this section, a "modification" means
either an increase or decrease in level of care. The provisions of this section do not apply if the
provider is a city located within the county or the county responsible for the emergency
management system."
SECTION 3. This act is effective when it becomes law. Section 1 of this act applies
to any franchise agreements or contracts for ambulance service initiated or renewed on or after
that date. A city or county with an existing franchise agreement or contract for ambulance service
in effect on the date this act becomes law shall not renew that agreement or contract. Section 2
of this act applies to any modification in the level of care occurring on or after the date this act
becomes law.
*H219-v-2*